Wisconsin, session 2025, SB291.
do enact as follows:SB291,1Section 1. 71.07 (3y) (a) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:71.07 (3y) (a) 2. “Eligible employee” has the meaning given in s. 238.308 (1) (a) (ar).SB291,2Section 2. 71.07 (3y) (b) 6. of the statutes is amended to read:71.07 (3y) (b) 6. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2023, the amount of the investment in the form of capital expenditures on workforce housing, as defined in s. 234.66 (1) (i), for employees, not to exceed 15 percent of such investment, and the amount of the investment in establishing an employee costs incurred to provide child care program for services for employees, as defined in s. 238.308 (1) (ag), not to exceed 15 percent of such investment costs, as determined by the Wisconsin Economic Development Corporation.SB291,3Section 3. 71.28 (3y) (a) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:71.28 (3y) (a) 2. “Eligible employee” has the meaning given in s. 238.308 (1) (a) (ar).SB291,4Section 4. 71.28 (3y) (b) 6. of the statutes is amended to read:71.28 (3y) (b) 6. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2023, the amount of the investment in the form of capital expenditures on workforce housing, as defined in s. 234.66 (1) (i), for employees, not to exceed 15 percent of such investment, and the amount of the investment made in establishing an employee costs incurred to provide child care program for services for employees, as defined in s. 238.308 (1) (ag), not to exceed 15 percent of such investment costs, as determined by the Wisconsin Economic Development Corporation.SB291,5Section 5. 71.47 (3y) (a) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:71.47 (3y) (a) 2. “Eligible employee” has the meaning given in s. 238.308 (1) (a) (ar).SB291,6Section 6. 71.47 (3y) (b) 6. of the statutes is amended to read:71.47 (3y) (b) 6. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2023, the amount of the investment in the form of capital expenditures on workforce housing, as defined in s. 234.66 (1) (i), for employees, not to exceed 15 percent of such investment, and the amount of the investment made in establishing an employee costs incurred to provide child care program for services for employees, as defined in s. 238.308 (1) (ag), not to exceed 15 percent of such investment costs, as determined by the Wisconsin Economic Development Corporation.SB291,7Section 7. 238.308 (1) (a) of the statutes is renumbered 238.308 (1) (ar).SB291,8Section 8. 238.308 (1) (ag) of the statutes is created to read:238.308 (1) (ag) “Costs incurred to provide child care services for employees” includes all of the following:1. Capital expenditures made to establish a child care program for employees.2. Expenditures made for the operation of a child care program under subd. 1.3. Expenditures to reimburse employees for child care expenses.4. Expenditures to purchase or reserve child care slots on behalf of employees.5. Contributions made by an employer to an employee’s dependent care flexible spending account.6. Any other cost or expense incurred due to a benefit provided by an employer to facilitate the provision or utilization by employees of child care services.SB291,9Section 9. 238.308 (2) (a) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:238.308 (2) (a) 1. The Subject to par. (d), the person is operating or intends to operate a business in this state.SB291,10Section 10. 238.308 (2) (d) of the statutes is created to read:238.308 (2) (d) The corporation may certify a nonprofit entity described in section 501 (c) (3) of the Internal Revenue Code for tax benefits for costs incurred to provide child care services for employees under sub. (4) (a) 6.SB291,11Section 11. 238.308 (4) (a) 6. of the statutes is amended to read:238.308 (4) (a) 6. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2023, an amount equal to up to 15 percent of the person’s investment in the form of capital expenditures on workforce housing, as defined in s. 234.66 (1) (i), for employees and up to 15 percent of the person’s investment in establishing an employee costs incurred to provide child care program for services for employees. Such investments may include only capital expenditures made by the person.SB291,12Section 12. Initial applicability.(1) This act first applies to taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024. Down Down /2025/related/vetoedinfull/sb291 true vetoedenrolledbills /2025/related/vetoedinfull/sb291 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/SB291 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/SB291 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Vetoed in Full»SB291: Text as Enrolled × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting